Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-410
Apprehension of deserters.

It shall be lawful for any civil officer having authority to apprehend offenders under the laws of the State of Nebraska summarily to apprehend a deserter from the Nebraska National Guard or a member of the military forces absent without leave and deliver him into the custody of the Nebraska National Guard.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 10, p. 1556.